District of Columbia statutes.
42-1902.20

Contraction of condominiums; amendment of declaration; recordation; withdrawal of land after conveyance of unit.

No condominium shall be contracted except in accordance with the provisions of the declaration and of this chapter. Any such contraction shall be deemed to have occurred at the time of the recordation of an amendment to the declaration, executed by the declarant, containing a legally sufficient description of the land withdrawn from the condominium. If portions of the withdrawable land were described pursuant to § 42-1902.10(d)(5), then no such portion shall be so withdrawn after the conveyance of any unit on such portion. If no such portions were described, then none of the withdrawable land shall be withdrawn after the first conveyance of any unit thereon.

Mar. 29, 1977, D.C. Law 1-89, title II, § 220, 23 DCR 9532b

History

This section is referenced in § 42-1901.02.

Section References

1981 Ed., § 45-1830.
1973 Ed., § 5-1230.

Prior Codifications